Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-734.02
Projection maps; requirements for use; school board; adopt policy.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, beginning in school year 2024-25, a public school shall not allow the use of a Mercator projection map in school. A public school shall only use the Gall-Peters projection map or a similar cylindrical equal-area projection map or the AuthaGraph projection map for display or use in the classroom.

(2) A Mercator projection map may be used in a classroom if such map is:

(a) Used in conjunction with other projection maps in a teaching exercise to demonstrate that all maps are flawed in some way and different map projections serve different functions and may affect how an individual views the world; or

(b)(i) Part of any (A) book or material obtained prior to July 19, 2024, (B) geographic information system, or (C) computer program that renders a three-dimensional representation of Earth based primarily on satellite imagery, such as Google Earth or similar software; and

(ii) A Gall-Peters projection map or a similar cylindrical equal-area projection map or an AuthaGraph projection map is displayed in the classroom or shown to students during the lesson in which a Mercator projection map is used.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school to dispose of or replace any book or material used in the classroom or obtained prior to July 19, 2024.

(4) The school board of each public school district shall adopt a policy to implement the requirements of this section.

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 90.
July 19, 2024